Utah statutes.
57-13a-103.   Notice of easement.

The holder of an easement established as provided by Section 57-13a-102 may file a notice describing the easement in the office of the county recorder of each county in which the easement or a portion of the easement is located.



Enacted by Chapter 318, 2007 General Session

